Texas statutes.
PARKS AND WILDLIFE CODE

TITLE 7. LOCAL AND SPECIAL LAWS

CHAPTER 216. HUNT COUNTY

SUBCHAPTER C. SABINE RIVER

Sec. 216.021. SABINE RIVER: NAVIGABILITY. (a) That part of the Sabine River located between its source and its juncture with the east boundary line of Hunt County is not a navigable stream for the purpose of hunting and fishing rights on and along the stream. This section does not divest the state of whatever title it may have to the bed or water of the stream.

(b) Article 5302, Revised Civil Statutes of Texas, 1925, does not apply to that portion of the Sabine River described in Subsection (a) of this section.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975.